Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.320

Continuance of hearing.

If twenty days shall not have elapsed between the first publication or the posting of such notices and the day set for hearing, the hearing shall be continued until such time as the court shall order. The court shall retain full jurisdiction of the matter, until final judgment on the assessments; and if the notice given shall prove invalid or insufficient the court shall order new notice to be given.

[ 1907 c 153 s 27; RRS s 9241. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 26; 1893 c 84 s 26.]